test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_kiedas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kieđâš: # MLO, ok
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Nom: kieđâš
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Gen: kieđii
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Acc: kieđii
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Ill: kieˊđâžân
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Loc: kieđiist
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Com: kieđijn
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Abe: kieđiittáá
    kieđâš+N+Ess: kieˊđâžin
    kieđâš+N+Par: kieˊđâžid
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Nom: kieđiih
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Gen: kieđij
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Acc: kieđijd
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Ill: kieđijd
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Loc: kieđijn
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Com: kieˊđijguin
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Abe: kieˊđijttáá

  Noun - nieidâš: # MLO, ok
    nieidâš+N+Sg+Nom: nieidâš
    nieidâš+N+Sg+Gen: nieiˊdii
    nieidâš+N+Sg+Acc: nieiˊdii
    nieidâš+N+Sg+Ill: nieˊidâžân
    nieidâš+N+Sg+Loc: nieiˊdiist
    nieidâš+N+Sg+Com: nieiˊdijn
    nieidâš+N+Sg+Abe: nieiˊdiittáá
    nieidâš+N+Ess: nieˊidâžin
    nieidâš+N+Par: nieˊdâžid
    nieidâš+N+Pl+Nom: nieiˊdiih
    nieidâš+N+Pl+Gen: nieiˊdij
    nieidâš+N+Pl+Acc: nieiˊdijd
    nieidâš+N+Pl+Ill: nieiˊdijd
    nieidâš+N+Pl+Loc: nieiˊdijn
    nieidâš+N+Pl+Com: nieˊidijguin
    nieidâš+N+Pl+Abe: nieˊidijttáá

  Noun - viiljâš: # MLO, ok
    viiljâš+N+Sg+Nom: viiljâš
    viiljâš+N+Sg+Gen: viljii
    viiljâš+N+Sg+Acc: viljii
    viiljâš+N+Sg+Ill: viiljâžân
    viiljâš+N+Sg+Loc: viljiist
    viiljâš+N+Sg+Com: viljijn
    viiljâš+N+Sg+Abe: viljiittáá
    viiljâš+N+Ess: viˊljâžin
    viiljâš+N+Par: viˊdjâžin
    viiljâš+N+Pl+Nom: viljiih
    viiljâš+N+Pl+Gen: viljij
    viiljâš+N+Pl+Acc: viljijd
    viiljâš+N+Pl+Ill: viljijd
    viiljâš+N+Pl+Loc: viljijn
    viiljâš+N+Pl+Com: viˊljijguin
    viiljâš+N+Pl+Abe: viˊljijttáá

  Noun - oovtâš: # MLO, ok
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Nom: oovtâš
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Gen: ovttii
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Acc: ovttii
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Ill: ovttiižân
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Loc: ovttiist
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Com: ovttijn
    oovtâš+N+Sg+Abe: ovttiittáá
    oovtâš+N+Ess: oˊvtâžin
    oovtâš+N+Par: oˊvtâžid
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Nom: ovttiih
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Gen: ovttij
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Acc: ovttijd
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Ill: ovttijd
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Loc: ovttijn
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Com: ovttijguin
    oovtâš+N+Pl+Abe: ovttijttáá
